California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) A description of the existing or proposed accommodations, including the type and number of time-share interests in the accommodations, and if the accommodations are proposed or not yet complete or fully functional, an estimated date of completion.

(3) The number of accommodations and time-share interests, expressed in periods of seven-day use availability or other time increments applicable to the time-share plan, committed to the multisite time-share plan, and available for use by purchasers and a representation about the percentage of useable time authorized for sale, and if that percentage is 100 percent, then a statement describing how adequate periods of time for maintenance and repair will be provided.

(4) A description of any existing or proposed amenities of the time-share plan and, if the amenities are proposed or not yet complete or fully functional, the estimated date of completion.

(5) The extent to which financial arrangements have been made for the completion of any incomplete, promised improvements.

(6) A description of the duration, phases, and operation of the time-share plan.

(7) The name and principal address of the managing entity and a description of the procedures, if any, for altering the powers and responsibilities of the managing entity and for removing or replacing it.

(8) The current annual budget as required by Section 11240, along with the projected assessments and a description of the method for calculating and apportioning the assessments among purchasers, all of which shall be attached as an exhibit to the public report.

(9) Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing together with a description of the purpose and the method of calculating the fee.

(10) A
 description of any financing offered by or available through the developer.

(11) A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the time-share interests.

(12) A description of any bankruptcies, pending civil or criminal suits, adjudications, or disciplinary actions of which the developer has knowledge, that would have a material effect on the developer’s ability to perform its obligations.

(13) Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by time-share purchasers for the use of any amenities related to the time-share plan.

(14) A description and amount of insurance coverage provided for the protection of the purchaser.

(15) The extent to which a
 time-share interest may become subject to a tax lien or other lien arising out of claims against purchasers of different time-share interests.

(16) A statement disclosing any right of first refusal or other restraint on the transfer of all or any portion of a time-share interest.

(17) A statement disclosing that a deposit made in connection with the purchase of a time-share interest shall be held by an escrow agent until expiration of any right to cancel the contract and that a deposit shall be returned to the purchaser if he or she elects to exercise his or her right of cancellation. Alternatively, if the commissioner has accepted from the developer a surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or other financial assurance, each of which shall be enforceable by the association, in lieu of placing deposits in an escrow account: (A) a statement disclosing that the developer has
 provided a surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or other financial assurance in an amount equal to or in excess of the funds that would otherwise be placed in an escrow account, (B) a description of the type of financial assurance that has been obtained, (C) a statement that if the purchaser elects to exercise his or her right of cancellation as provided in the contract, the developer shall return the deposit, and (D) a description of the person or entity to whom the purchaser should apply for payment.

(18) A statement that the assessments collected from the purchasers will be kept in a segregated account separate from the assessments collected from the purchasers of other time-share plans managed by the same managing entity, along with a statement identifying the location of the account and a disclosure of the rights of owners to inspect the records pertaining to their accounts.

(19) If the time-share plan provides purchasers with the opportunity to participate in an exchange program, a description of the name and address of the exchange company and the method by which a purchaser accesses the exchange program.

(20) Any other information that the developer, with the approval of the commissioner, desires to include in the public report.

(21) Any other information reasonably requested by the commissioner.

(b) Public reports for specific time-share interest multisite time-share plans shall include the following additional disclosures:

(1) A description of each component site, including the name and address of each component site.

(2) The number of
 accommodations and time-share interests, expressed in periods of seven-day use availability or other time increments applicable to each component site of the time-share plan, committed to the multisite time-share plan and available for use by purchasers and a representation about the percentage of useable time authorized for sale, and if that percentage is 100 percent, then a statement describing how adequate periods of time for maintenance and repair will be provided.

(3) Each type of accommodation in terms of the number of bedrooms, bathrooms, and sleeping capacity, and a statement of whether or not the accommodation contains a full kitchen. For purposes of this description, a “full kitchen” means a kitchen having a minimum of a dishwasher, range, sink, oven, and refrigerator.

(4) A description of amenities available for use by the purchaser at each component site.

(5) A description of the reservation system, which shall include the following:

(A) The entity responsible for operating the reservation system, its relationship to the developer, and the duration of any agreement for operation of the reservation system.

(B) A summary of the rules and regulations governing access to and use of the reservation system.

(C) The existence of and an explanation regarding any priority reservation features that affect a purchaser’s ability to make reservations for the use of a given accommodation on a first-come-first-served basis.

(6) The name and principal address of the managing entity for the multisite time-share plan and a description of the procedures, if any,
 for altering the powers and responsibilities of the managing entity and for removing or replacing it.

(7) A description of any right to make any additions, substitutions, or deletions of accommodations, amenities, or component sites, and a description of the basis upon which accommodations, amenities, or component sites may be added to, substituted in, or deleted from the multisite time-share plan.

(8) A description of the purchaser’s liability for any fees associated with the multisite time-share plan.

(9) The location of each component site of the multisite time-share plan, the historical occupancy of each component site for the prior 12-month period, if the component site was part of the multisite time-share plan during the 12-month time period, as well as any periodic adjustment or amendment to the reservation
 system that may be needed in order to respond to actual purchaser use patterns and changes in purchaser use demand for the accommodations existing at that time within the multisite time-share plan.

(10) Any other information that the developer, with the approval of the commissioner, desires to include in the time-share disclosure statement.

(c) Public reports for nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plans shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the developer.

(2) A description of the type of interest and usage rights the purchaser will receive.

(3) A description of the duration and operation of the time-share plan.

(4) A description of the type of insurance coverage provided for each component site.

(5) An explanation of who holds title to the accommodations of each component site.

(6) A description of each component site, including the name and address of each component site.

(7) The number of accommodations and time-share interests, expressed in periods of seven-day use availability or other time increments applicable to the multisite time-share plan for each component site committed to the multisite time-share plan and available for use by purchasers and a representation about the percentage of useable time authorized for sale, and if that percentage is 100 percent, then a statement describing how adequate periods of time for maintenance and repair will be
 provided.

(8) Each type of accommodation in terms of the number of bedrooms, bathrooms, and sleeping capacity, and a statement of whether or not the accommodation contains a full kitchen. For purposes of this description, a “full kitchen” means a kitchen having a minimum of a dishwasher, range, sink, oven, and refrigerator.

(9) A description of amenities available for use by the purchaser at each component site.

(10) A description of any incomplete amenities at any of the component sites along with a statement as to any assurance for completion and the estimated date the amenities will be available.

(11) The location of each component site of the multisite time-share plan, the historical occupancy of each component site for the prior 12-month period, if
 the component site was part of the multisite time-share plan during such 12-month time period, as well as any periodic adjustment or amendment to the reservation system that may be needed in order to respond to actual purchaser use patterns and changes in purchaser use demand for the accommodations existing at that time within the multisite time-share plan.

(12) A description of any right to make any additions, substitutions, or deletions of accommodations, amenities, or component sites, and a description of the basis upon which accommodations, amenities, or component sites may be added to, substituted in, or deleted from the multisite time-share plan.

(13) A description of the reservation system that shall include all of the following:

(A) The entity responsible for operating the reservation system, its relationship
 to the developer, and the duration of any agreement for operation of the reservation system.

(B) A summary of the rules and regulations governing access to and use of the reservation system.

(C) The existence of and an explanation regarding any priority reservation features that affect a purchaser’s ability to make reservations for the use of a given accommodation on a first-come-first-served basis.

(14) A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances that materially affect the purchaser’s use rights.

(15) The name and principal address of the managing entity for the multisite time-share plan and a description of the procedures, if any, for altering the powers and responsibilities of the managing entity and for removing or replacing it, and a
 description of the relationship between a multisite time-share plan managing entity and the managing entity of the component sites of a multisite time-share plan, if different from the multisite time-share plan managing entity.

(16) The current annual budget as provided in Section 11240, along with the projected assessments and a description of the method for calculating and apportioning the assessments among purchasers, all of which shall be attached as an exhibit to the public report.

(17) Any current fees or charges to be paid by time-share purchasers for the use of any amenities related to the time-share plan and a statement that the fees or charges are subject to change.

(18) Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the
 fee.

(19) A description of any financing offered by or available through the developer.

(20) A description of any bankruptcies, pending civil or criminal suits, adjudications, or disciplinary actions of which the developer has knowledge, which would have a material effect on the developer’s ability to perform its obligations.

(21) A statement disclosing any right of first refusal or other restraint on the transfer of all or any portion of a time-share interest.

(22) A statement disclosing that a deposit made in connection with the purchase of a time-share interest shall be held by an escrow agent until expiration of any right to cancel the contract and that a deposit shall be returned to the purchaser if he or she elects to exercise his or her right of
 cancellation. Alternatively, if the commissioner has accepted from the developer a surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or other financial assurance in lieu of placing deposits in an escrow account: (A) a statement disclosing that the developer has provided a surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or other financial assurance in an amount equal to or in excess of the funds that would otherwise be placed in an escrow account, (B) a description of the type of financial assurance that has been arranged, (C) a statement that if the purchaser elects to exercise his or her right of cancellation as provided in the contract, the developer shall return the deposit, and (D) a description of the person or entity to whom the purchaser should apply for payment.

(23) If the time-share plan provides purchasers with the opportunity to participate in an exchange program, a description of the name and address of the exchange company and the method by
 which a purchaser accesses the exchange program.

(24) Any other information that the developer, with the approval of the commissioner, desires to include in the time-share disclosure statement.

(d) The commissioner may establish by regulation provisions regarding the delivery of the public report and other required information through alternative media forms.

(e) The commissioner may, upon finding that the subject matter is otherwise adequately covered or the information is unnecessary or inapplicable, waive any requirement set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 88, Sec. 2.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11235.

(a) A person who has entered into a contract to purchase a short-term product shall have the right to rescind the contract until midnight of the seventh calendar day, or a later time as provided in the contract, following the day on which the contract is first made, in which event the purchaser shall be entitled to a refund of 100 percent of the consideration paid under the contract, without deduction.

(b) The developer or other person who offers a short-term product shall clearly and conspicuously disclose, in writing, to all purchasers of a short-term product, all of the following:

(1) The right of rescission provided for in subdivision (a).

(2) That reservations for accommodations under the contract are subject to availability and that there is no guarantee that a purchaser will be able to obtain specific accommodations during a specific time period, if applicable.

(3) Specific blackout dates, if applicable.

(4) That the earlier the purchaser requests a reservation, the greater the opportunity to received a confirmed reservation.

(5) That, if the purchaser later purchases a time-share interest, the developer shall provide the purchaser with the then-current public report for the time-share plan being purchased and that the purchaser shall have until midnight of the seventh calendar day following receipt of the public report to cancel the purchase of the time-share interest.

(c) If a purchaser is unable to obtain a confirmed reservation for a specific accommodation and time period requested, the developer or other person who offers the short-term product shall attempt to provide the purchaser with a substantially similar alternative to the reservation requested. If the developer or other person who offers the short-term product is unable to provide the reservation requested or an acceptable alternative during the initial term of the contract, the purchaser may request and be granted an extension of the contract for a period of 12 months.

(d) The contract for the purchase of a short-term product shall include the date of the contract and shall contain, in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the purchaser, a conspicuous statement as follows:
 “YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO MIDNIGHT OF THE SEVENTH (7TH) [or later] CALENDAR DAY AFTER THE DATE OF THIS CONTRACT AND RECEIVE A FULL REFUND. YOU MAY EXERCISE YOUR RIGHT TO CANCEL BY SENDING A FACSIMILE, OR BY DEPOSIT, FIRST-CLASS POSTAGE PREPAID, INTO THE UNITED STATES MAIL TO THE FOLLOWING ADDRESS: (SPECIFIC CONTACT INFORMATION)”

(e) A purchaser of a short-term product may exercise the right of rescission by giving written notice to the owner of the short-term product as specified in subdivision (b), using a preprinted form
 provided by the developer. The developer or other person who offers the short-term product shall cause any deposit given by a purchaser who has exercised the right to rescind described in subdivision (a) to be returned to the purchaser not later than the last to occur of 10 business days following receipt of the purchaser’s written notice of rescission, or 10 business days following the date upon which any deposit becomes good and immediately available funds.

(f) A developer or other person who offers a short-term product shall do one of the following:

(1) Place any purchase money funds received from the purchaser of a short-term product into an independent escrow depository until the seven-day period for rescission described in subdivision (a) has expired.

(2) Post a bond to secure the return of a purchaser’s
 purchase money funds in a form and in an amount prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) Make alternative arrangements satisfactory to the commissioner to secure the owner’s obligation to return the purchase money funds.

(g) If applicable, the developer shall disclose to the purchaser the type of alternative arrangement to be used and, in the event of a claim, to whom the purchaser should apply for payment under the alternative arrangement.

(h) The developer shall compensate the association for any services acquired from the association or for any of the association’s property used when fulfilling a short-term product in excess of services or use of property provided to other owners.

(i) If the contract for a short-term product is negotiated primarily in
 Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, or Korean, orally or in writing, the developer shall provide to the prospective purchaser prior to the commencement of the rescission period an unexecuted translation of the contract in the language in which the contract was negotiated. The terms of the short-term contract that is executed in the English language shall determine the rights and obligations of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11236.

(a) A receipt on the form specified herein shall be taken by or on behalf of the developer from each person executing a reservation agreement under authority of a preliminary public report and each person who has made a written offer to purchase or lease a time-share interest under authority of a preliminary, conditional, or final public report.

(b) The developer or his or her agent shall retain
 each receipt for a final public report for a period of three years from the date of the receipt and shall make the receipts available for inspection by the commissioner or his or her designated representative during regular business hours.

(c) The form approved by the commissioner for the acknowledgment of receipt of a preliminary, conditional, or final public report shall be as follows:

“RECEIPT FOR PUBLIC REPORT The Law and Regulations of the commissioner require that you as a prospective purchaser or lessee be afforded an opportunity to read the public report for this time-share before you execute a contract to purchase or lease a time-share interest or before any money or other consideration toward purchase or lease of a time-share interest is accepted from you.
 You must be afforded an opportunity to read the report before a written reservation or any deposit in connection therewith is accepted from you.
DO NOT SIGN THIS RECEIPT UNTIL YOU HAVE RECEIVED A COPY OF THE REPORT AND HAVE READ IT.
 I have read the commissioner’s public report on ____ (File No., Tract No., or Name). I understand the report is not a recommendation or endorsement of the time-share, but is for information only. The date of the public report which I received and read is ____.
 Developer Is Required to Retain This Receipt for Three Years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11237.

(a) If a purchaser of a time-share interest in a time-share plan is offered the opportunity to acquire an incidental benefit in connection with the sale of a time-share interest, the developer shall provide the purchaser with a disclosure statement containing all of the following information:

(1) A general description of the incidental benefit, including the terms and conditions governing the
 use of the incidental benefit.

(2) A statement that the continued availability of the incidental benefit is not necessary for the use and enjoyment of the purchaser’s use of any accommodation of the time-share plan.

(3) A statement that the purchaser’s use of or participation in the incidental benefit is completely voluntary, and payment of any fee or other cost associated with the incidental benefit is required only upon that use or participation.

(4) A listing of the fees, if any, that the purchaser will be required to pay to use the incidental benefit.

(5) A statement that no costs of acquisition, operation, maintenance, or repair of the incidental benefit shall be passed on to purchasers of time-share interests in the time-share plan as a common
 expense of the time-share plan.

(b) A developer shall include in its initial application for registration, a description of any incidental benefits which may be used by the developer. The developer may, but shall not be required to describe the incidental benefits in the public report for the time-share plan.

(c) The incidental benefit disclosure is not required to be filed with the commissioner prior to the use of the disclosure. However, the commissioner may request and review the records of the developer to ensure that the incidental benefit disclosure required by this section has been given to purchasers and to ensure that the statements required to be made in the disclosure are accurate as to the operation of each incidental benefit offered by the developer. The developer shall deliver the records to the commissioner within 10 business days of the commissioner’s
 request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11238.

(a) The purchase contract entered into by any person who has made an offer to purchase a time-share interest or interests, any incidental benefit, made on the same day or within seven calendar days after the person attended a sales presentation for a time-share interest, or any right under an exchange program, made on the same day or within seven calendar days after the person attended a sales presentation for a time-share interest, shall be voidable by the purchaser, without penalty, within seven calendar days, or a
 longer period as provided in the contract, after the receipt of the public report or the execution of the purchase contract, whichever is later.

(1) The purchase contract for the time-share interest shall provide notice of the seven-day cancellation period, together with the name and mailing address to which any notice of cancellation shall be delivered.

(2) Notice of cancellation shall be deemed timely if given not later than midnight of the seventh calendar day.

(b) A person who has made an offer to purchase a time-share interest, incidental benefit, or rights under an exchange program as described above may exercise the right of cancellation granted by this section by giving written notification of the notice to cancel to the developer at the place of business designated by the developer in the purchase
 contract.

(c) If the notice of cancellation is by United States mail, a rebuttable presumption shall exist that notice was given on the date that it is postmarked. If the notice is sent by facsimile, it shall be considered given on the date of a confirmed transmission. If the notice is by means of a writing sent other than by United States mail or telegraph, it shall be considered as given at the time of delivery at the place of business designated by the developer. Exercising the rescission rights of the time-share interest shall also automatically rescind any agreement for the purchase of an incidental benefit or an enrollment into an exchange program where the agreements were entered into in conjunction with the purchase of the time-share interest.

(d) Each developer shall utilize and furnish each purchaser with a fully completed and executed copy of a contract pertaining to
 the sale of a time-share interest, which contract shall include the following information:

(1) The actual date the contract is executed by each party.

(2) The names and addresses of the developer and time-share plan.

(3) The initial purchase price and any additional recurring or nonrecurring charges, or a good faith estimate if the amount of those charges cannot then be determined, that the purchaser will be required to pay in connection with the purchase of the time-share interest, including, but not limited to, the current year’s annual assessment for common expenses and financing charges.

(4) The estimated date of completion of construction of each accommodation promised to be completed which is not completed at the time the contract is executed.

(5) A brief description of the nature and duration of the time-share interest being sold, including whether any interest in real property is being conveyed.

(6) The specific number of years of the term of the time-share plan.

(7) Immediately prior to the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the purchaser, the developer shall disclose, in conspicuous type, substantially the following notice of cancellation:

You may cancel this contract without any penalty or obligation within seven calendar days of receipt of the public report or after the date you sign this contract, whichever date is later. If you decide to cancel this contract, you must notify the developer in writing of your intent to cancel. Your notice of cancellation shall be
 effective upon the date sent and shall be sent to (name of developer) at (address of developer). Your notice of cancellation may also be sent by facsimile to (facsimile number of the developer) or by hand-delivery. Any attempt to obtain a waiver of your cancellation right is void and of no effect.

(8) The purchase contract for an interest in a single site or specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan without an accommodation in this state shall include the following additional disclosure in conspicuous type:

The accommodations of this time-share plan are located outside of California. As such, the management (including all matters relating to the association, the association budget, and any management contract) of this time-share plan is not governed by California law, but by the applicable law, if any, of the jurisdiction in which the accommodations are
 located as stated in the public report. You should review the governing documents related to the association, the association’s budget, and the management of the time-share plan.

(e) If rescission is sought by the purchaser in accordance with this section, and a court finds the developer denied the rescission in violation of this section, the court may also award reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs to the prevailing purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 429, Sec. 4.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

11239.

(a) To inform a purchaser of his or her right of cancellation under Section 11238, the developer shall attach to the face page of every copy of a public report given to a prospective purchaser, the cancellation notice set forth in subdivision (b) thereof printed in conspicuous type.

(b) The form and content of the notice shall be as follows:NOTICE OF
 CANCELLATION RIGHTS
 You may cancel the purchase of the time-share interest(s) in the time-share plan identified below without any penalty or obligation and are legally entitled to the return of all money and other considerations that you have given toward the purchase. If you decide to cancel your purchase, you must notify the developer in writing of your intent to cancel within seven calendar days of receipt of the public report or the date you sign the purchase contract, whichever date is later. Your notice of cancellation shall be effective upon the date sent and shall be sent to the developer at the address or facsimile number provided in your purchase contract. Any attempt to obtain a waiver of your cancellation right is void and of no effect.
(c) Each notice shall also contain the following form. The form shall have all developer-related information completed by the developer and
 may be used by a purchaser to cancel the sale of the time-share interest:
(Name of Developer) (Address of Developer)(Facsimile Number of Developer)(Name of Time-share Plan)(DRE Registration File Number)RE: ELECTION TO CANCEL THE SALE OF A TIME-SHARE INTEREST(S)I hereby elect to cancel my purchase of the time-share interest(s) in the above-name time-share plan.
(Date)(Signature)(Print Name)(Signature)(Print Name)

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11240.

An estimated operating budget for the time-share plan shall be filed with the commissioner along with the other information required to be registered pursuant to this chapter, and shall contain the following information:

(a) The estimated annual expenses of the time-share plan along with the estimated revenue of the association from all sources, including the amounts collectible from purchasers as assessments. The estimated payments by the purchaser for assessments shall
 also be stated in the estimated amounts for the times when they will be due. Expenses shall be shown in a manner that enables the purchaser to calculate the annual expenses associated with the time-share interest being purchased. Expenses that are personal to purchasers that are not uniformly incurred by all purchasers or that are not provided for or contemplated by the time-share plan documents may be excluded from this estimate.

(b) (1) The estimated items of expenses of the time-share plan and the association, except as excluded under subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, if applicable, the following items, that shall be stated either as association expenses collectible by assessments or as expenses of the purchaser payable to persons other than the association:

(2) Expenses for the association:

(A) Administration of the association.

(B) Management fees.

(C) Maintenance.

(D) Rent for accommodations.

(E) Taxes upon time-share property.

(F) Taxes upon leased areas.

(G) Insurance.

(H) Security provisions.

(I) Other expenses.

(J) Operating capital.

(K) Equitable apportionment of expenses between time-share and non-time-share uses of the common area, if
 applicable.

(L) Reserves for deferred maintenance and reserves for capital expenditures. All reserves for any accommodations and common areas of a time-share plan located in this state shall be based upon the estimated life and replacement cost of accommodations and common elements of the time-share plan. For any accommodations and common elements of a time-share plan located outside of this state, the developer shall disclose the amount of reserves for deferred maintenance and capital expenditures required by the law of the situs state, if applicable, and maintained for those accommodations and common elements, which amount of reserves shall be based on the estimated life and replacement cost of each reserve item. The developer or the association shall include in the budget a reasonable reserve accumulation plan. A plan that (i) provides for reserves to be funded within five years at a level of 50 percent of the amount specified in the reserve
 study as fully funded, and (ii) requires those reserves collected in any given year to equal or exceed the amount of reserve expenditures estimated for that year shall be deemed to be a reasonable reserve accumulation plan. The funding of reserves may be based on collection of reserve amounts in conjunction with annual assessments, or on some alternative mechanism, including, but not limited to, a bond, letter of credit, or similar mechanism. Collection of required reserve amounts solely by one or more special assessments is not reasonable. If control of the association is in owners other than the developer, and such owners vote not to maintain reserves or to maintain reserves at less than 50 percent, the failure to maintain the required level of reserves shall not be cause for denying the developer a public report.

(c) The estimated amounts shall be stated for a period of at least 12 months and may distinguish between the period prior to the
 time that purchasers elect a majority of the board of administration and the period after that date.

(d) The budget of a phase time-share plan shall contain a note identifying the number of time-share interests covered by the budget, indicating the number of time-share interests, if any, estimated to be declared as part of the time-share plan during that calendar year, and projecting the common expenses for the time-share plan based upon the number of time-share interests estimated to be declared as part of the time-share plan during that calendar year.

(e) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state, the budget shall include the subject matter set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive. The budget shall be in compliance with the applicable laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property
 or component site is located, and if there is a conflict between the affirmative standards set forth in the laws of the situs state and the requirements set forth in this section, the law of the situs state shall control. If the budget provides for the matters contained in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, the budget shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section, and the developer shall not be required to make revisions in order to comply with this section.

(f) The budget shall include a certification subscribed and sworn by an expert in the preparation of time-share plan budgets, who may be (1) an independent public accountant, (2) a certified public accountant, who is an employee of the developer, or (3) at the discretion of the commissioner, an individual or entity acceptable to the commissioner to conduct the review. Acceptance of the individual or entity shall not be considered an endorsement by the
 commissioner of a proposed budget. The budget certification shall also be signed by the developer or on behalf of the developer by an appropriate officer, if the developer is a corporation, or the managing member, if the developer is a limited liability company. The certification concerning the adequacy of the budget shall be in the following form:

On behalf of the developer of the captioned time-share plan, I/my firm has reviewed or prepared the budget containing projections of income and expenses for time-share operation. My/our experience in this field includes: [List experience.]

I/we have reviewed the budget and investigated the facts set forth in the budget and the facts underlying it with due diligence in order to form a basis for this certification.

I/we certify that the
 projections in the budget appear reasonable and adequate based on present prices (adjusted to reflect continued inflation and present levels of consumption for comparable units similarly situated) or, for an existing project, based on historical data for the project.

I/we certify that the budget:

(1) Sets forth in detail the terms of the transaction as it relates to the budget and is complete, current, and accurate.

(2) Affords potential purchasers an adequate basis upon which to found their judgment.

(3) Does not omit any material fact.

(4) Does not contain any untrue statement of a material
 fact.

(5) Does not contain any fraud, deception, concealment, or suppression.

(6) Does not contain any promise or representation as to the future which is beyond reasonable expectation or unwarranted by existing circumstances.

(7) Does not contain any representation or statement which is false, where I/we:

(A) Knew the truth.

(B) With reasonable effort could have known the truth and made no reasonable effort to ascertain the truth.

(C) Did not have knowledge concerning the representation or
 statement made.

I/we understand that a copy of this certification is intended to be incorporated into the public report so that prospective purchasers may rely on it.

This certification is made under the penalty of perjury for the benefit of all persons to whom this offer is made. We understand that violations are subject to the civil and criminal penalties of the laws of California.

The certification shall be dated within 90 days prior to the date of the submission of the budget to the commissioner. The expert’s certification shall be based on experience in the management of hotel, resort, or time-share properties and disclose the approximate number of properties managed and length of time managed, together with other relevant real estate experience, qualifications, and licenses.

(g) Any budget that is not certified by an independent certified public accountant or an employee of the developer who is licensed as a certified public accountant may be reviewed by the commissioner to confirm the accuracy of the certification.

(h) The certified budget for the time-share plan shall be prepared and submitted by the developer to the commissioner annually for as long as the registration is in effect. If the budget is increased more than 20 percent in any year, the developer shall submit to the commissioner, along with the increased budget, evidence that the requirements of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 11265 have been met. The budget shall be submitted at least 15 days prior to the first day of the period that it covers. Upon the submission of each annual budget, the exhibit to the public report specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (16) of subdivision (c) of, Section 11234
 shall be updated. The updating of the exhibit shall not be considered to constitute an amendment of the public report.
